Illinois, session 104th, HB3798.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 7Authority for grants to Community Healing Resource Centers 8(CHRC) for their operational expenses. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.